Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1405.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1204.2(b) and (b.1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended by adding paragraphs and subsection (f) is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1204.2. Career and Technical Instructional Certificate.--* * *(b) In addition to other requirements promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall issue a Career and Technical Intern Certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.151 (relating to eligibility and criteria) to an individual seeking a position with the primary responsibility of 12345678910111213141516171819 teaching occupational skills in State-approved career and technical education programs in the public schools of this Commonwealth if the individual presents any of the following:* * *(5) Evidence that a veteran has served in the United States Armed Forces for a minimum of eight thousand (8,000) hours, equivalent to four (4) years full-time, in the occupational area to be taught.(b.1) In addition to other requirements promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall issue a Career and Technical Instructional I Certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.142 (relating to Career and Technical Instructional I) to an individual seeking a position with the primary responsibility of teaching occupational skills in State-approved career and technical education programs in the public schools of this Commonwealth if the individual presents any of the following:* * *(5) Evidence that a veteran has served in the United States Armed Forces for a minimum of eight thousand (8,000) hours, equivalent to four (4) years full-time, in the occupational area to be taught.* * *(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Veteran" shall mean an individual who:(1) served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or National Guard; and20250HB1405PN1604 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) was discharged or released from that service under conditions other than dishonorable.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1405PN1604 - 3 - 1234